Utah statutes.
53B-16-301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Person" means:

(a)  a federal, state, or local governmental entity:

(i)  that sponsors sponsored research; or

(ii)  participates in a technology transfer;

(b)  an individual;

(c)  a nonprofit or profit corporation;

(d)  a partnership;

(e)  a sole proprietorship; or

(f)  other type of business organization.

(2)  "Public institution of higher education" means an institution within the state system of higher education defined in Section 53B-1-102.

(3)  "Restricted record" means a record that is restricted as provided by Section 53B-16-303.

(4)  "Sponsored research" refers to research, training, and other sponsored activities as defined by the federal Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget:

(a)  conducted by a public institution of higher education through an office responsible for sponsored projects or programs; and

(b)  funded or otherwise supported by an external person that is not created or controlled by the public institution of higher education.

(5)  "Technology transfer" refers to transferring information, commercializing research, or providing technical assistance between a public institution of higher education and external persons for the purpose of economic development.



Amended by Chapter 201, 2005 General Session

